Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0779.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 39. A segment 2 curriculum course provided under this act must meet all of the following requirements: (a) Be offered only to a student who has done all of the following: (i) Successfully completed a segment 1 curriculum driver education course. (ii) Held a valid level 1 graduated driver license for not less than 3 continuous months. (iii) Acquired 30 or more hours driving experience on a level 1 graduated driver license that includes, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, not less than 2 hours of night driving with a licensed parent or legal guardian, or with the permission of a parent or legal guardian, with any licensed driver who is 21 years of age or older. The nighttime hours requirement does not apply to a person an individual who has been issued a graduated driver license that permits daylight driving only as provided in R 257.3 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (b) Contain 6 or more hours of classroom instruction that is scheduled so the student receives not more than 2 hours of classroom instruction per day. (c) Provide instruction explaining the right to make an anatomical gift in the event of death under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123. Instructional materials to effectuate this subdivision must be developed in cooperation with the federally designated organ procurement organization for this state and must include information on how to join the state organ, tissue, and eye donor registry. The following apply to instruction provided under this subdivision: (i) If instruction material is provided at no cost to the driver education provider in an electronic medium and the provider uses a compatible type of electronic medium in providing instruction under this section, the provider shall show the instruction material to its students. (ii) If instruction material is provided at no cost to the driver education provider in the form of a brochure or other written material, the provider shall provide the material to its students. (d) Provide instruction concerning approaching and passing a stationary authorized emergency vehicle in compliance with section 653a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.653a.